Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.560

Concessions.

The county legislative authority may transfer the proceeds from concessions for food and other services accruing to the county from park or park facilities which are located in a park and recreation service area to the fund of the service area in the office of the county treasurer to be disbursed under the service area budget.

[ 1981 c 210 s 14; 1963 c 218 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.